Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Chapter 83. Mississippi Technology, Inc. Liaison Committee

§ 57-83-1.
Establishment; duties.

The President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall each appoint three (3) members of their respective legislative houses to serve as members of the Mississippi Technology, Inc., Liaison Committee. The members of such committee shall be entitled (a) to attend meetings of the Mississippi Technology, Inc., Board of Directors, (b) to receive all budgets, reports, audits and all financial and other information distributed to the directors of Mississippi Technology, Inc., (c) to meet and confer with the directors and staff of Mississippi Technology, Inc., and (d) to perform such other activities as may be necessary or proper in discharging their responsibilities of liaison with their respective houses of the Legislature. The members of the liaison committee shall have no jurisdiction or vote on any matter within the jurisdiction of Mississippi Technology, Inc. The members of the committee shall prepare and submit an annual report to the Legislature no later than December 15 of each calendar year setting forth the activities and financial condition of Mississippi Technology, Inc., and their perspective and comments on the activities of Mississippi Technology, Inc. The report shall also contain recommendations regarding policy or legislative changes for consideration by the Legislature. The members of the Mississippi Technology, Inc., Liaison Committee shall be bound by the same limitations as to confidentiality of information regarding products, processes or the internal affairs of private businesses, as are imposed upon the officers and directors of Mississippi Technology, Inc. When the Legislature is not in session, members shall be paid per diem and all actual and necessary expenses, including mileage expenses, from their respective contingent expense funds at the rate authorized for committee meetings when the Legislature is not in session; however, no per diem and expenses will be paid when the Legislature is in session. The terms of the members of the liaison committee shall expire at the end of their terms of office.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 339, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1999.